Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-808
Commission; issue regulations.

The commission shall issue such regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1975, LB 145, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-436;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 358.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.